Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW to read as follows:Revenue collected as a charge, fee, or tax based on the miles a motor vehicle travels on the highways shall be paid into the state treasury and placed in a special fund to be used exclusively for highway purposes, and may only be used for highway purposes permitted in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW to read as follows:Revenue collected as a charge, fee, or tax based on the miles a motor vehicle travels on the highways shall be paid into the state treasury and placed in a special fund to be used exclusively for highway purposes, and may only be used for highway purposes permitted in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.--- END ---